District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.01

Jurisdiction over MacArthur Boulevard.

Jurisdiction and control over MacArthur Boulevard for its full width in the District of Columbia between Foxhall Road and the District line, excepting a strip 19 feet wide within the lines of said road, the center of which is coincident with the center of the water supply conduit, is hereby transferred from the Secretary of the Army to the Council of the District of Columbia, and property abutting thereon shall be subject to any and all lawful assessments which may be levied by the said Council for public improvements, the same as other private property in the District of Columbia; provided, that all municipal laws and regulations shall apply to the entire width of the said road in the District of Columbia in the same degree that they apply to other streets and highways in the said District.

May 22, 1926, 44 Stat. 627, ch. 372
Mar. 4, 1942, 56 Stat. 123, ch. 129
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(172) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 7-1201.
1981 Ed., § 7-1401.